Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5296XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2160 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Examination of public 1 records ââ enforcement. 2 The board of directors of a school district shall comply 3 with all applicable provisions of chapter 22. If the board 4 of directors of a school district fails to comply with any 5 applicable provision of chapter 22, a person aggrieved by the 6 board of directorsâ failure may enforce the personâs rights 7 under chapter 22 pursuant to the provisions of chapter 22, 8 including sections 22.5 and 22.10. 9